Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6039.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14-1-59 of the General Laws in Chapter 14-1 entitled "Proceedings
in Family Court" is hereby amended to read as follows:
14-1-59. Cooperation of public and private agencies.
It is made the duty of every state, town, or municipal official or department, including, but
not limited to, the department of children, youth, and families, the department of health, the
department of human services, the department of elementary and secondary education, every school
district, the office of substance abuse, and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals, to render all assistance and cooperation within his, her, or its jurisdictional
power which may further the objects of this chapter. All institutions or agencies providing services
to any child are required to give to the court any information concerning the child that the court
may require. The court is authorized to seek the cooperation of all societies or organizations having
for their object the protection or aid of children, and their physical or spiritual welfare; and the
court shall utilize the available services of all of those societies and organizations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002340
========